Maryland, session 2026, SB0029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
6–103.
(b) (1) The State Board shall:
(i) prepare guidelines and instructions relating to the petition
process; and
(ii) design and arrange to have sample forms available to the public
conforming to this title for each purpose for which a petition is authorized by law.
– 1 –

Ch. 439 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) WHEN PREPARING GUIDELINES AND INSTRUCTIONS FOR
COMPLIANCE WITH THE PLAIN LANGUAGE REQUIREMENT OF § 6–201(C)(2)(II) OF
THIS TITLE, THE STATE BOARD SHALL:
(I) CONSIDER ANY GENERALLY ACCEPTED GUIDELINES
REGARDING COMPLIANCE WITH THE FEDERAL PLAIN WRITING ACT OF 2010; AND
(II) PROHIBIT THE USE OF THE PASSIVE VOICE, LEGAL JARGON,
AND DOUBLE NEGATIVES.
(3) The guidelines, instructions, and forms shall be provided to the public,
on request, without charge.
6–201.
(a) A petition shall contain:
(1) an information page; and
(2) signature pages containing not less than the total number of signatures
required by law to be filed.
(c) Each signature page shall contain:
(1) a description of the subject and purpose of the petition, conforming to
the requirements of regulations;
(2) if the petition seeks to place a question on the ballot[, either]:
(i) A BRIEF TITLE THAT DESCRIBES THE TOPIC, GOAL, OR
OUTCOME OF THE BALLOT QUESTION;
(II) 1. a fair and accurate summary of the substantive provisions
of the proposal WRITTEN IN PLAIN, CLEAR LANGUAGE THAT:
A. A VOTER CAN EASILY UNDERSTAND;
B. DOES NOT EXPLAIN THE LEGAL MECHANISM
PROVIDING FOR THE POLICY CHANGE; AND
C. DOES NOT CONTAIN LEGAL JARGON OR USE DOUBLE
NEGATIVES OR THE PASSIVE VOICE; or
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 439
[(ii)] 2. the full text of the proposal; AND
(III) A BRIEF STATEMENT EXPLAINING WHAT THE PRACTICAL
OUTCOME OF EACH VOTING CHOICE WOULD BE;
(3) a statement, to which each signer subscribes, that:
(i) the signer supports the purpose of that petition process; and
(ii) based on the signer’s information and belief, the signer is a
registered voter in the county specified on the page and is eligible to have his or her
signature counted;
(4) spaces for signatures and the required information relating to the
signers;
(5) a space for the name of the county in which each of the signers of that
page is a registered voter;
(6) a space for the required affidavit made and executed by the circulator;
and
(7) any other information required by regulation.
(d) If the petition seeks to place a question on the ballot and the sponsor elects to
print a summary of the proposal on each signature page as provided in subsection [(c)(2)(i)]
(C)(2)(II)1 of this section:
(1) the circulator shall have the full text of the proposal present at the time
and place that each signature is affixed to the page; and
(2) the signature page shall state that the full text is available from the
circulator.
7–103.
(b) Each question shall appear on the ballot containing the following information:
(1) a question number or letter as determined under subsection (d) of this
section;
(2) a brief designation of the type or source of the question;
(3) a brief [descriptive] title in boldface type THAT DESCRIBES THE
TOPIC, GOAL, OR OUTCOME OF THE BALLOT QUESTION;
– 3 –

Ch. 439 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) a condensed statement [of the purpose of the question] DESCRIBING
THE CHANGE IN POLICY TO BE ADOPTED IN PLAIN AND CLEAR LANGUAGE THAT:
(I) A VOTER CAN EASILY UNDERSTAND;
(II) DOES NOT EXPLAIN THE LEGAL MECHANISM PROVIDING
FOR THE POLICY CHANGE; AND
(III) DOES NOT CONTAIN LEGAL JARGON OR USE DOUBLE
NEGATIVES OR THE PASSIVE VOICE; [and]
(5) the voting choices that the voter has; AND
(6) A BRIEF STATEMENT EXPLAINING WHAT THE PRACTICAL
OUTCOME OF EACH VOTING CHOICE WOULD BE.
(c) (1) [The] ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING A
GENERAL ELECTION, THE Secretary of State shall prepare and certify to the State Board[,
not later than the 95th day before the general election,] the information required under
subsection (b) of this section, for all statewide ballot questions and all questions relating to
an enactment of the General Assembly which is petitioned to referendum.
(2) [The] ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING A
GENERAL ELECTION, THE State Board shall prepare and certify to the appropriate local
board[, not later than the 105th day before the general election,] the information required
under subsection (b) of this section for all questions that have been referred to the voters of
one county or part of one county pursuant to an enactment of the General Assembly.
(3) (i) [The] ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING A
GENERAL ELECTION, THE county attorney of the appropriate county shall prepare and
certify to the State Board[, not later than the 95th day before the general election,] the
information required under subsection (b) of this section for each question to be voted on in
a single county or part of a county, except a question covered by paragraph (1) or paragraph
(2) of this subsection.
(ii) If the information required under subsection (b) of this section
has not been timely certified under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the clerk of the
circuit court for the jurisdiction shall prepare and certify that information to the State
Board not later than the first Friday in August.
(4) (i) [The] ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING A
GENERAL ELECTION, THE municipal attorney of the appropriate municipal corporation
shall prepare and certify to the State Board[, not later than the 95th day before the general
election,] the information required under subsection (b) of this section for each question to
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 439
be voted on in the municipal corporation, except a question covered by paragraphs (1)
through (3) of this subsection.
(ii) If the information required under subsection (b) of this section
has not been timely certified under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the clerk of the
circuit court for the county in which the municipal corporation is located shall prepare and
certify that information to the State Board not later than the first Friday in August.
(5) (I) THE STATE BOARD SHALL MAKE THE INFORMATION
SUBMITTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC
FOR A 15–DAY COMMENT PERIOD.
(II) ON OR BEFORE THE FOURTH DAY IMMEDIATELY
FOLLOWING THE END OF THE COMMENT PERIOD REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH
(I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE PERSON REQUIRED TO PREPARE A QUESTION UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1), (2), (3), OR (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
1. REVIEW THE COMMENTS RECEIVED DURING THE
COMMENT PERIOD AND MAKE ANY NECESSARY CHANGES TO THE QUESTION; AND
2. SUBMIT THE CERTIFIED PLAIN TEXT OF THE
QUESTION TO THE STATE BOARD FOR PUBLICATION ON ITS WEBSITE UNDER § 9–207
OF THIS ARTICLE.
(6) The information required under subsection (b) of this section for a
question that is being placed on the ballot by petition may be prepared before the petition
is certified under § 6–208 of this article.
7–105.
(a) A local board shall provide notice of each question to be submitted statewide
and each question to be submitted to the voters of the county, by:
(1) specimen ballot mailed at least 1 week before any early voting period
before the general election; or
(2) publication or dissemination by mass communication during the 3
weeks immediately preceding the general election at which a question will appear on the
ballot.
(b) (1) For any question submitted under Article XIV or Article XVI of the
Maryland Constitution, the notice required by subsection (a) of this section shall contain
the information specified in § 7–103(b) of this title and a brief statement, prepared in clear
and concise language, devoid of technical and legal terms to the extent practicable,
summarizing the question.
– 5 –

Ch. 439 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) The statement required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be:
(i) prepared by the Department of Legislative Services;
(ii) approved by the Attorney General; and
(iii) submitted to the State Board by the first Monday in August.
(3) The statement required under paragraph (1) of this subsection is
sufficient if it is:
(i) contained in an enactment by the General Assembly, and the
enactment clearly specifies that the statement is to be used on the ballot; or
(ii) consistent with some other process mandated by the Maryland
Constitution.
(c) The State Board shall adopt regulations governing notice of questions to
appear on the ballot, including the use and content of specimen ballots and the publication
or dissemination of notice by mass communication.
(d) (1) The complete text of a question shall be posted or available for public
inspection in the office of the State Board and each applicable local board for 65 days prior
to the general election.
(2) Copies of the complete text of all statewide questions shall be furnished
by the State Board to the local boards in quantities as determined by the State Board,
including quantities sufficient to provide one copy of each for posting in each polling place
and in each local board office.
(3) An individual may receive without charge a copy of the complete text of
all constitutional amendments and questions from a local board, either in person, by mail,
or electronically.
(E) THE STATE BOARD AND EACH APPLICABLE LOCAL BOARD SHALL POST
IN A MANNER WIDELY ACCESSIBLE TO THE PUBLIC FOR AT LEAST 90 DAYS BEFORE
THE GENERAL ELECTION:
(1) THE COMPLETE TEXT OF:
(I) FOR A QUESTION RELATING TO THE CREATION OR
ADOPTION OF A NEW CONSTITUTION, THE PROPOSED CONSTITUTION;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 439
(II) FOR AN AMENDMENT UNDER ARTICLE XIV OF THE
MARYLAND CONSTITUTION, THE PROPOSED AMENDMENT TO THE MARYLAND
CONSTITUTION;
(III) FOR AN ENACTMENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
REFERRED IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE XVI OF THE MARYLAND
CONSTITUTION, THE ENACTMENT;
(IV) FOR A PROPOSED COUNTY CHARTER OR AMENDMENT TO A
COUNTY CHARTER UNDER ARTICLE XI–A OF THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION:
1. THE PROPOSED CHARTER; OR
2. THE PROPOSED AMENDMENT TO A COUNTY CHARTER;
(V) FOR AN ENACTMENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
REFERRING A QUESTION TO THE VOTERS, THE ENACTMENT; AND
(VI) FOR A CHARTER COUNTY ENACTMENT IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 9–205 OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE OR A CODE COUNTY
ENACTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 9–310 THROUGH 9–313 OF THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE PROPOSED ENACTMENT; AND
(2) FOR EACH QUESTION POSTED UNDER ITEM (1)(II), (III), (IV), (V),
OR (VI) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A LINK TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OR COUNTY
WEBPAGE FOR THE APPLICABLE LEGISLATION.
9–207.
(a) The State Board shall certify and publicly display the content and
arrangement of each ballot:
(1) for a primary election, at least 64 days before the election;
(2) for a general election, at least 64 days before the election;
(3) for a special primary election, at least 55 days before the election; and
(4) for a special general election, not later than a date specified in the
Governor’s proclamation.
(b) The Supreme Court of Maryland, on petition of the State Board, may establish
a later date in extraordinary circumstances.
– 7 –

Ch. 439 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) The State Board shall publicly display the content and arrangement of each
certified ballot on its website.
(d) Except pursuant to a court order under § 9–209 of this subtitle, or as provided
in § 9–208 of this subtitle, the content and arrangement of the ballot may not be modified
after the second day of the public display.
(e) Unless a delay is required by court order, the State Board may begin to print
the ballots after certification and 3 days of public display and correct any noted errors.
(F) THE CERTIFICATION OF A BALLOT UNDER THIS SECTION THAT
INCLUDES A QUESTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO BE A CERTIFICATION OF THE
BALLOT LANGUAGE REQUIRED TO BE INCLUDED ON THE BALLOT UNDER § 7–103 OF
THIS ARTICLE, INCLUDING THE PLAIN LANGUAGE CONDENSED STATEMENT
REQUIRED UNDER § 7–103(B)(4) OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 8 –